Maryland, session 2025, SB0650.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
SUBTITLE 12. DOMESTIC VIOLENCE OFFENDER REGISTRY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0650*

SENATE BILL 650
11–1201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIME” MEANS:
(1) A CRIME OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, AS DEFINED IN § 4–701 OF THE
FAMILY LAW ARTICLE; OR
(2) A CRIME COMMITTED BY A DEFENDANT AGAINST A VICTIM WHO
HAD A SEXUAL RELATIONSHIP WITH THE DEFENDANT WITHIN THE 12 MONTHS
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE COMMISSION OF THE CRIME.
(C) “REGISTRANT” MEANS A PERSON REQUIRED TO REGISTER UNDER §
11–1204 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) “REGISTRY” MEANS THE DOMESTIC VIOLENCE OFFENDER REGISTRY
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 11–1203 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) “RELEASE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–701 OF THIS TITLE.
11–1202.
FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE, A PERSON IS CONVICTED WHEN THE
PERSON:
(1) IS FOUND GUILTY OF A CRIME BY A JURY OR JUDICIAL OFFICER;
OR
(2) ENTERS A PLEA OF GUILTY OR NOLO CONTENDERE.
11–1203.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A CENTRAL
COMPUTERIZED REGISTRY OF ALL PERSONS WHO ARE REQUIRED TO REGISTER IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 11–1204 OF THIS SUBTITLE, TO BE KNOWN AS THE DOMESTIC
VIOLENCE OFFENDER REGISTRY.
(B) THE REGISTRY SHALL BE UPDATED BASED ON INFORMATION MADE
AVAILABLE TO THE DEPARTMENT, INCLUDING INFORMATION ACQUIRED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE REGISTRATION PROVISIONS OF §§ 11–1204 AND 11–1205

SENATE BILL 650 3
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) FOR EACH REGISTRANT, THE REGISTRY SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE REGISTRANT’S NAME;
(2) THE REGISTRANT’S RESIDENTIAL ADDRESS;
(3) THE DATE AND A DESCRIPTION OF THE CRIMES FOR WHICH
REGISTRATION IS REQUIRED; AND
(4) A DIGITAL IMAGE OF THE REGISTRANT’S HEAD AND SHOULDERS
TAKEN IN FULL–FACE VIEW.
11–1204.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A PERSON
CONVICTED THREE OR MORE TIMES OF A DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIME SHALL
REGISTER WITH THE COUNTY SHERIFF FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE PERSON
RESIDES ON OR BEFORE THE DATE THAT THE PERSON:
(1) IS RELEASED;
(2) IS GRANTED PROBATION;
(3) IS GRANTED A SUSPENDED SENTENCE; OR
(4) RECEIVES A SENTENCE THAT DOES NOT INCLUDE A TERM OF
IMPRISONMENT.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A PERSON IS NO
LONGER SUBJECT TO REGISTRATION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IF:
(1) ALL UNDERLYING CONVICTIONS REQUIRING REGISTRATION ARE
REVERSED, VACATED, OR SET ASIDE;
(2) THE REGISTRANT IS PARDONED FOR ALL UNDERLYING
CONVICTIONS; OR
(3) SUBJECT TO § 11–1207 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE CIRCUIT COURT IN
THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE PERSON RESIDES ENTERS AN ORDER EXEMPTING THE
PERSON FROM THE REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 650
11–1205.
(A) A REGISTRANT SHALL PROVIDE THE COUNTY SHERIFF WITH THE
FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(1) THE REGISTRANT’S LEGAL NAME;
(2) THE REGISTRANT’S CURRENT ADDRESS OR LOCATION;
(3) THE CRIMES FOR WHICH THE REGISTRANT WAS CONVICTED; AND
(4) THE DATES AND LOCATIONS OF THE CRIMES.
(B) THE COUNTY SHERIFF SHALL OBTAIN A DIGITAL IMAGE OF THE
REGISTRANT’S HEAD AND SHOULDERS TAKEN IN FULL–FACE VIEW.
(C) A REGISTRANT SHALL UPDATE THE REGISTRANT’S REGISTRATION
INFORMATION:
(1) ANNUALLY; AND
(2) TO REFLECT ANY CHANGE IN ADDRESS WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER
THE CHANGE.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
REGISTRATION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL REMAIN IN EFFECT FOR A PERIOD OF
15 YEARS FOLLOWING EITHER THE DATE OF THE LATEST CONVICTION OR THE DATE
OF RELEASE FROM THE LATEST PERIOD OF INCARCERATION, WHICHEVER IS LATER.
(2) THE PERIOD DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE EXTENDED AN ADDITIONAL 20 YEARS FOR EACH CONVICTION FOR A
DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIME THAT OCCURS AFTER THE INITIAL REGISTRATION.
(E) THE COUNTY SHERIFF SHALL FORWARD ALL REGISTRATION
INFORMATION TO THE DEPARTMENT.
11–1206.
INFORMATION CONTAINED IN THE DOMESTIC VIOLENCE OFFENDER
REGISTRY SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC THROUGH THE INTERNET,
BY TELEPHONE, BY WRITTEN ACCESS, AND IN PERSON.
11–1207.

SENATE BILL 650 5
(A) A PERSON WHO WOULD OTHERWISE BE REQUIRED TO REGISTER UNDER
§ 11–1204 OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY PETITION THE CIRCUIT COURT IN THE COUNTY IN
WHICH THE PERSON RESIDES FOR AN ORDER EXEMPTING THE PERSON FROM THE
REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) (I) THE CIRCUIT COURT MAY ENTER AN ORDER EXEMPTING A
PERSON FROM THE REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE IF THE
COURT FINDS THAT:
1. THE CIRCUMSTANCES OF EACH OF THE
DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIMES, IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE PERSON’S CRIMINAL
HISTORY, DO NOT INDICATE A RISK THAT THE PERSON WILL COMMIT ANOTHER
DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIME; AND
2. THE PERSON IS NOT A DANGER TO OTHERS.
(II) THE CIRCUIT COURT SHALL SPECIFY IN WRITING THE
REASONS FOR ITS FINDINGS.
(2) ON MAKING THE FINDINGS DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE CIRCUIT COURT SHALL ENTER AN ORDER EXEMPTING THE
PERSON FROM THE REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE AND
ORDERING THE DEPARTMENT TO REMOVE THE PERSON’S REGISTRATION
INFORMATION FROM THE REGISTRY.
11–1208.
(A) A PERSON WHO IS SUBJECT TO REGISTRATION UNDER § 11–1204 OF
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT KNOWINGLY:
(1) FAIL TO REGISTER WITH THE COUNTY SHERIFF; OR
(2) FAIL TO PROVIDE ACCURATE INFORMATION WHEN REGISTERING
UNDER § 11–1204 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $2,000.
Article – Family Law
4–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.

SENATE BILL 650
(b) “Abuse” has the meaning stated in § 4–501(b)(1) of this title.
(c) “Domestic violence” means abuse occurring between:
(1) current or former spouses or cohabitants;
(2) persons who have a child in common; or
(3) persons currently or formerly involved in a dating relationship.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.